Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3521
Governing board; rates and fees; establish.

The governing board of each hospital which is existing and operating under the general powers granted to counties of this state or under the provisions of sections 23-3501 to 23-3519 and 23-3528 to 23-3572, shall establish rates and fees to be charged for care or services, or both care and services rendered to persons by its hospital.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.69.